languagetool-language-modules/gl/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/gl/hunspell/gl_ES.dic
amigábel/12 po:adxectivo
anastigmático/10,15 po:adxectivo
atacábel/12 po:adxectivo
atlético/10,15 po:adxectivo
cabalístico/10,15 po:adxectivo
caedizo/10,15 po:adxectivo
cantábel/12 po:adxectivo
centralizador/10,14 po:adxectivo
climatolóxico/10,15 po:adxectivo
computábel/12 po:adxectivo
conxuntural/12 po:adxectivo
daltónico/10,15 po:adxectivo
desdobrábel/12 po:adxectivo
desobstruente/10 po:adxectivo
desviador/10,14 po:adxectivo
diluviano/10,15 po:adxectivo
edificábel/12 po:adxectivo
escatolóxico/10,15 po:adxectivo
exfoliábel/12 po:adxectivo
fastixiado/10,15 po:adxectivo
fiscalizador/10,14 po:adxectivo
freudiano/10,15 po:adxectivo
goberneiro/10,15 po:adxectivo
imperdoábel/12 po:adxectivo
impuro/10,15 po:adxectivo
indisociábel/12 po:adxectivo
interpretábel/12 po:adxectivo
iodado/10,15 po:adxectivo
mao/10,17 po:adxectivo
marxado/10,15 po:adxectivo
matizábel/12 po:adxectivo
oxidable/10 po:adxectivo
panasiático/10,15 po:adxectivo
pasábel/12 po:adxectivo
picón/10,16 po:adxectivo
rabuxento/10,15 po:adxectivo
rectificábel/12 po:adxectivo
retractor/10,14 po:adxectivo
salineiro/10,15 po:adxectivo
san/10,17 po:adxectivo
só/10,17 po:adxectivo
solidificábel/12 po:adxectivo
teresiano/10,15 po:adxectivo
verdeal/12 po:adxectivo
bacallaeiro/10,15 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
capón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
delimitador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
marcador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
nu/10,17 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
sensor/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
serial/12 po:adxectivo / substantivo masculino
adormentador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
antecesor/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
arnoiao/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
articulado/10,15 po:adxectivo / substantivo
aseteador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
berrón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
burelao/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
burlador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
cacholán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
carneirán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
chorón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
cornelán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
cualificador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
entoador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
euscaldún/10,17 po:adxectivo / substantivo
fargallón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
fungón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
hippy/11 po:adxectivo / substantivo
hoteleiro/10,15 po:adxectivo / substantivo
imitador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
júnior/11 po:adxectivo / substantivo
lacazán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
leilán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
mamón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
mentirán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
normalizador/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
orellán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
papaleisón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
pastrán/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
reitor/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
respondón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
samoiedo/10,15 po:adxectivo / substantivo
sevillano/10,15 po:adxectivo / substantivo
trampón/10,16 po:adxectivo / substantivo
turuleque/10,17 po:adxectivo / substantivo
vendedor/10,14 po:adxectivo / substantivo
ámbolos/17 po:contracción
entrámbolos/17 po:contracción
nun/10,17 po:contracción
boguina/10 po:substantivo feminino
dama/10 po:substantivo feminino
gardenia/10 po:substantivo feminino
mielite/10 po:substantivo feminino
química/10 po:substantivo feminino
usanza/10 po:substantivo feminino
bispel/12 po:substantivo masculino
bolso/10 po:substantivo masculino
carácter/13 po:substantivo masculino
cónsul/12,17 po:substantivo masculino
ditirambo/10 po:substantivo masculino
esquinal/12 po:substantivo masculino
gnomon/13 po:substantivo masculino
leninismo/10 po:substantivo masculino
leu/13 po:substantivo masculino
lev/13 po:substantivo masculino
pirogalol/12 po:substantivo masculino
póster/11 po:substantivo masculino
príncipe/10 po:substantivo masculino
rally/11 po:substantivo masculino
troll/13 po:substantivo masculino
vedor/10 po:substantivo masculino
whisky/11 po:substantivo masculino
cincocentos/17 po:numeral
setecentos/17 po:numeral
dous/10,17 po:numeral / substantivo masculino
ambos/17 po:pronome
entrambos/17 po:pronome
nosoutros/17 po:pronome
seu/10,17 po:pronome
desadestrado/10,15 po:participio / adxectivo
avó/10,17 po:substantivo
conde/10,17 po:substantivo
contador/10,14 po:substantivo
emisario/10,15 po:substantivo
inventor/10,14 po:substantivo
recamador/10,14 po:substantivo
solista/10 po:substantivo
tataravó/10,17 po:substantivo
fretador/10,14 po:substantivo / adxectivo
